Utah statutes.
41-1a-412.   Design of personalized plates.

The personalized license plates shall be the same color and design as regular license plates designed for the type of vehicle being licensed and shall consist of numbers, letters, or any combination as fixed by the division, provided that there are no conflicts with existing or anticipated license plate series.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

